District of Columbia statutes.
1-1214

Penalties for taking higher fees.

Any notary public who shall take a higher fee than is prescribed by § 1-1213 shall pay a fine of $100 and be removed from office by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1280, ch. 854, § 572
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 263, Pub. L. 89-493, § 3
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, § 155(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 1-814.
1973 Ed., § 1-515.

Prior Codifications